Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2217
Bondholders; rights protected; suit at law or in equity.

Any holder of bonds issued under the Nebraska Highway Bond Act or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, except to the extent the rights given by such act may be restricted by resolution of the commission, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of this state or as granted under the act or under the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by such laws, by such act, or by such resolution to be performed by the commission or by any employee thereof.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 17, p. 1112;

Laws 1988, LB 632, § 12.